Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1153
Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact; compact privilege to practice.

A person holding a compact privilege to practice in Nebraska under the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact may engage in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as authorized pursuant to such compact.

Laws 2025, LB148, § 4.

Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact, see section 38-4801.